Nevada, session 83, SB171.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 629 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A health care licensing board shall not disqualify a person
from licensure or subject any person to discipline solely:
(a) For providing or assisting in the provision of medically
necessary gender-affirming health care services; or
(b) As a consequence of any judgment, discipline or other
sanction threatened or imposed under the laws of the District of
Columbia or any state or territory of the United States for
providing or assisting in the provision of medically necessary
gender-affirming health care services,
 if the gender-affirming health care services were provided with
parental consent, unless the minor would have been expressly
authorized to consent to the services under the laws of this State,
and the services, as provided, would have been lawful in this State.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Gender-affirming health care services”:
(1) Means medical, surgical, counseling or referral services
that respect the gender identity or expression of the patient and
are found by a competent medical professional to be appropriate
based upon the wishes of a patient and in accordance with the
laws of this State, including, without limitation:
(I) Interventions to suppress the development of
endogenous secondary sex characteristics;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(II) Interventions to align the appearance or physical
body of the patient with the gender identity or expression of the
patient;
(III) Interventions to alleviate symptoms of clinically
significant distress resulting from gender dysphoria, as defined in
the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of
Mental Disorders published by the American Psychiatric
Association; and
(IV) Developmentally appropriate exploration and
integration of identity, reduction of distress, adaptive coping and
strategies to increase family acceptance.
(2) Does not include conversion therapy, as defined in
NRS 629.600.
(b) “Health care licensing board” means:
(1) A board created pursuant to chapter 630, 630A, 631,
632, 633, 634, 634A, 634B, 635, 636, 637, 637B, 639, 640, 640A,
640B, 640C, 640D, 640E, 641, 641A, 641B, 641C or 641D of NRS.
(2) The Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services.
(c) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted
standards of medical practice;
(2) Clinically appropriate with regard to type, frequency,
extent, location and duration;
(3) Not provided primarily for the convenience of the
patient or provider of health care;
(4) Required to improve a specific health condition of a
patient or to preserve the existing state of health of the patient;
and
(5) The most clinically appropriate level of health care that
may be safely provided to the patient.
 A provider of health care prescribing, ordering, recommending
or approving a health care service or product does not, by itself,
make that health care service or product medically necessary.
Sec. 2. Chapter 179 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 179.177 to 179.235,
inclusive, the Governor shall not surrender, or issue a warrant
pursuant to NRS 179.191 for the arrest of, any person in this State
who is charged in another state with a criminal violation of the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
laws of that other state if the violation alleged involves the
provision or receipt of or assistance with medically necessary
gender-affirming health care services, unless the acts forming the
basis of the prosecution of the crime charged would constitute a
criminal offense under the laws of the State of Nevada.
2. The provisions of this section do not apply in the
circumstance where a demand for the extradition of a person
charged with a crime in another state is made in accordance with
NRS 179.183, and the person who is the subject of the demand
was physically present in the demanding state at the time of the
commission of the alleged offense and thereafter fled from that
state.
3. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to
apply to the provision of medically necessary gender-affirming
health care services without parental consent unless the minor is
authorized to consent to those services under the laws of this State.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Gender-affirming health care services”:
(1) Means medical, surgical, counseling or referral services
that respect the gender identity or expression of the patient and
are found by a competent medical professional to be appropriate
based upon the wishes of a patient and in accordance with the
laws of this State, including, without limitation:
(I) Interventions to suppress the development of
endogenous secondary sex characteristics;
(II) Interventions to align the appearance or physical
body of the patient with the gender identity or expression of the
patient;
(III) Interventions to alleviate symptoms of clinically
significant distress resulting from gender dysphoria, as defined in
the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of
Mental Disorders published by the American Psychiatric
Association; and
(IV) Developmentally appropriate exploration and
integration of identity, reduction of distress, adaptive coping and
strategies to increase family acceptance.
(2) Does not include conversion therapy, as defined in
NRS 629.600.
(b) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted
standards of medical practice;
(2) Clinically appropriate with regard to type, frequency,
extent, location and duration;
(3) Not provided primarily for the convenience of the
patient or provider of health care;
(4) Required to improve a specific health condition of a
patient or to preserve the existing state of health of the patient;
and
(5) The most clinically appropriate level of health care that
may be safely provided to the patient.
 A provider of health care prescribing, ordering, recommending
or approving a health care service or product does not, by itself,
make that health care service or product medically necessary.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(d) The words and terms defined in NRS 179.179 have the
meanings ascribed to them in that section.
Sec. 3. Chapter 232 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise required by the order of a court of
competent jurisdiction, a state agency shall not provide any
information or expend or use time, money, facilities, property,
equipment, personnel or other resources of the State in
furtherance of any investigation or proceeding initiated in or by
another state that seeks to impose civil or criminal liability or
professional sanction upon a person or entity for:
(a) The provision, securing or receiving of, or any inquiry
concerning, medically necessary gender-affirming health care
services that are legal in this State; or
(b) Any assistance given to any person or entity that relates to
the provision, securing or receiving of, or any inquiry concerning,
medically necessary gender-affirming health care services that are
legal in this State.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to any
investigation or proceeding where the conduct that is subject to
potential liability under the investigation or proceeding initiated in
or by the other state would be subject to civil or criminal liability
or professional sanction under the laws of the State of Nevada, if
committed in this State.
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a state
agency or an employee, appointee, officer or other person acting
on behalf of a state agency may provide information or assistance
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
in connection with such an investigation or proceeding in
response to a written request by the person who is the subject of
the investigation or proceeding.
4. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to
apply to the provision, securing or receipt of medically necessary
gender-affirming health care services without parental consent,
unless the minor is authorized to consent to those services under
the laws of this State.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Gender-affirming health care services”:
(1) Means medical, surgical, counseling or referral services
that respect the gender identity or expression of the patient and
are found by a competent medical professional to be appropriate
based upon the wishes of a patient and in accordance with the
laws of this State, including, without limitation:
(I) Interventions to suppress the development of
endogenous secondary sex characteristics;
(II) Interventions to align the appearance or physical
body of the patient with the gender identity or expression of the
patient;
(III) Interventions to alleviate symptoms of clinically
significant distress resulting from gender dysphoria, as defined in
the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of
Mental Disorders published by the American Psychiatric
Association; and
(IV) Developmentally appropriate exploration and
integration of identity, reduction of distress, adaptive coping and
strategies to increase family acceptance.
(2) Does not include conversion therapy, as defined in
NRS 629.600.
(b) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted
standards of medical practice;
(2) Clinically appropriate with regard to type, frequency,
extent, location and duration;
(3) Not provided primarily for the convenience of the
patient or provider of health care;
(4) Required to improve a specific health condition of a
patient or to preserve the existing state of health of the patient;
and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(5) The most clinically appropriate level of health care that
may be safely provided to the patient.
 A provider of health care prescribing, ordering, recommending
or approving a health care service or product does not, by itself,
make that health care service or product medically necessary.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(d) “State agency” means an agency, bureau, board,
commission, department, division, officer, employee, appointee or
agent or any other unit of the Executive Department of the State
Government.
Sec. 4. 1. Each health care licensing board that licenses
providers of health care who provide gender-affirming health care
services shall examine the feasibility of providing opportunities for
reciprocity of licensure to providers of health care who provide
gender-affirming health care services in other states to facilitate the
provision of quality gender-affirming health care services to persons
from other states who seek medically necessary gender-affirming
health care services in this State.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Gender-affirming health care services” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 1 of this act.
(b) “Health care licensing board” has the meaning ascribed to it
in section 1 of this act.
(c) “Medically necessary” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 1 of this act.
(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)